Hawaii statutes.
[§6E-82] Lands included. (a) Except
as provided in subsection (b), the following lands shall be included in the
south Kona wilderness area:

(1) Honomalino: All lands from the shoreline to six
thousand feet inland;

(2) Okoe: All lands from the shoreline to six
thousand feet inland. The Honomalino and Okoe sections include approximately
one thousand four hundred fifty-eight acres;

(3) Kaulanamauna: The Manuka natural area reserve
boundary extended to the shoreline; and

(4) Manuka: The Manuka natural area reserve boundary
extended to the shoreline.

(b) Any parcel of land included in subsection
(a) upon which there is a dwelling house as of July 1, 2011, together with any
outbuildings forming a part of the residential complex, shall be excluded from
the south Kona wilderness area.

(c) Land use district boundaries existing as
of July 1, 2011, shall continue in full force and effect subject to amendment
as provided in chapter 205. [L 2011, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next